California statutes. Education Code
(q) “Region” means a geographic area of the state defined by economic and labor market factors containing at least one industry cluster and the cities, counties, or community college districts, or all of them, in the industry cluster’s geographic area. For the purposes of this chapter, “California Community College economic development regions” shall be designated by the board of governors based on factors, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) Regional economic development and training needs of business and industry.

(2) Regional collaboration, as appropriate, among community colleges and districts, and existing economic development, continuous workforce improvement, technology deployment, and business development.

(3) Other state economic development definitions of
 regions.

(r) “Sector strategies” means prioritizing investments in competitive and emerging industry sectors and industry clusters on the basis of labor market and other economic data that indicate strategic growth potential, especially with regard to jobs and income. Sector strategies focus workforce investment in education and workforce training programs that are likely to lead to high-wage jobs or to entry-level jobs with well-articulated career pathways into high-wage jobs. Sector strategies effectively boost labor productivity or reduce business barriers to growth and expansion stemming from workforce supply problems, including skills gaps, and occupational shortages by directing resources and making investments to plug skills gaps and provide education and training programs for high-priority occupations. Sector strategies may be implemented using articulated career pathways or career lattices and a system of stackable credentials. Sector
 strategies often target underserved communities, disconnected youth, incumbent workers, and recently separated military veterans. Cluster-based sector strategies focus workforce and economic development on those sectors that have demonstrated a capacity for economic growth and job creation in a particular geographic area. Industry clusters are similar to industry sectors, but the focus is on a geographic concentration of interdependent industries.

(s) “Skills panel” means a collaboration which brings together multiple employers from an industry sector or industry cluster with career technical educators, including, but not limited to, community college career technical education faculty, and other stakeholders which may include workers and organized labor to address common workforce needs. Skills panels assess workforce training and education needs through the identification of assets relevant to industry need, produce curricula models, perform
 job task analysis, define how curricula articulate into career pathways or career lattices or a system of stackable credentials, calibrate career readiness, develop other assessment tools, and produce career guidance tools.

(t) “Stackable credentials” means a progression of training modules, credentials, or certificates that build on one another and are linked to educational and career advancement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 52.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. California Community Colleges Business Resource Assistance and Innovation Network Trust Fund [88625. - 88625.]

88625.

The California Community Colleges Business Resource Assistance and Innovation Network Trust Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury as a special fund administered by the board of governors. The board of governors may solicit direct contributions for deposit in the fund from various nonstate public and private sources for the purpose of funding the program. Special funds in the trust shall be placed in a surplus money investment account to earn interest. Interest generated by funds deposited in this trust fund shall be reinvested in the fund, and may only be used to fund eligible projects and activities of the program and related board of governors initiatives. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the fund may be
 expended for purposes of administering grants and contracts for providing services, through the program, to public and private entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Centers and Regional Collaboratives [88630. - 88631.]

88630.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the programs and services provided through the program shall be flexible and responsive to the needs identified through the statewide and regional planning process. Services shall be demand driven, and delivery structures shall be agile, performance oriented, cost effective, and contribute to regional economic growth and competitiveness. The use of economic and workforce development program centers, local economic development corporations, industry-driven regional collaboratives, and business networks, employers, and service providers shall provide a stable and flexible response mechanism for the identification of training priorities and to focus resources on
 intensive projects for competitive and emerging industry sectors. These networks shall have the flexibility to meet the demand for new and emerging growth sectors and be formed, modified, eliminated, and reformed for short- or long-term responses customized to the duration of the need. Programs and projects developed and implemented at centers and industry-driven regional collaborative projects shall act as catalysts for future career technical education programs in the system.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that centers shall be established as the long-term structure of the network’s service delivery system. Centers shall provide regional sites to efficiently respond to employer and worker needs, and shall deliver services for the strategic initiative areas pursuant to the mission of the community colleges economic and workforce
 development program.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that industry-driven regional collaboratives perform services as participants of regional networks. Grants by industry-driven regional collaboratives shall provide flexibility for local projects to assess and define their individual project needs. New local programs and equipment shall be key components of these grants. Funding shall not be limited per project, but shall be based on the merit and reasonable cost for the anticipated outcomes and performance of the project. Funding for industry-driven regional collaboratives shall be limited to two consecutive fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------

88631.

Economic and workforce development program centers and California Community Colleges participation in industry-driven regional collaboratives may provide any or all of the following services and perform the following functions as participants of networks, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(a) Convening skill panels to produce deliverables, such as curriculum models, that contribute to workforce skill development common to competitive and emerging industry sectors and industry clusters within a region.

(b) Development of instructional packages focusing on the technical
 skill specific to emerging or changing occupations in targeted industry sectors and industry clusters.

(c) Support student or worker evaluation of, and fit for, career paths by articulating how a curriculum model fits within a career pathway or career lattice or system of stackable credentials, relevant career readiness battery scores, and career guidance tools.

(d) Faculty mentorships, faculty and staff development, in-service training, and worksite experience supporting the new curriculum and instructional modes responding to identified regional needs.

(e) Institutional support, professional development, and transformational activities focused on removing systemic barriers to the development of new methods,
 transition to a flexible and more responsive administration of programs, and the timely and cost-effective delivery of services.

(f) The deployment of new methodologies, modes, and technologies that enhance performance and outcomes and improve cost-effectiveness of service delivery or create new college programs.

(g) One-on-one counseling, seminars, workshops, and conferences that contribute to the achievement of the success of existing businesses and foster the growth of new
 businesses and jobs in emerging industry clusters.

(h) The delivery of performance-improvement training, which shall be provided on a matching basis to employers to benefit workforce participants. This will promote continuous workforce improvement in identified strategic priority areas, identified industry clusters, or areas targeted in the regional business resource assistance and innovation network plans.

(i) Credit, not-for-credit, and noncredit programs and courses that contribute to workforce skill development for competitive and emerging industry sectors and industry clusters within a region or that focus on addressing a workforce skills gap or occupational shortage.

(j) Subsidized student
 internships or work-based learning on a cash or in-kind matching basis for program participants in occupational categories identified in competitive and emerging industry sectors and industry clusters.

(k) Acquisition of equipment to support the eligible activities and the limited renovation of facilities to accommodate the delivery of eligible services.

(l) Submission of performance data for aggregation by the chancellor’s office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Job Development Incentive Training Program [88640. - 88643.]

88640.

(a) (1) Programs and activities of the Job Development Incentive Training Program shall include a strong partnership with state and local economic development entities, workforce development agencies, community-based organizations, and the private sector. It is the intent of the Legislature that this program provide training on a no-cost or low-cost basis to participating employers who create employment opportunities at an acceptable wage level for the attainment of self-sufficiency by both of the following groups:

(A) Recipients of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code.

(B) Clients determined to be eligible because they are employed at a wage too low to attain self-sufficiency.

(2) Guidelines for the determination of eligibility under this subdivision shall be developed by the chancellor’s office in consultation with the appropriate agencies responsible for collecting appropriate data. A structured career ladder methodology may be implemented in this program area.

(3) Funds received from other eligible programs, including, but not necessarily limited to, programs under the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-220) and other applicable programs selected by the chancellor, or a combination of programs, may be used to provide funds to match job
 development incentive training funds.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the expenditure of funds
 under this section should lead measurably to the upgrading of highly skilled and technical workers, upgrade opportunities for those who are employed at a wage too low to attain self-sufficiency, and the creation of jobs for new entrants into the workforce.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------

88641.

Annual appropriations for the Job Development Incentive Training Program may be allocated for the purposes of supporting eligible activities if, as a result of the workforce improvement services provided to employers, entry-level positions are created within the industry cluster. Participating employers may receive eligible services such as performance-based training, and other eligible services that stimulate productivity and growth in targeted industrial clusters on a matching basis. Any annual savings from this section shall be available for expenditure for purposes of the Industry-Driven Regional Collaborative Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------

88642.

Matching fund requirements shall be waived for employers who receive training services through the Job Development Incentive Training Program and who accomplish either of the following:

(a) Create employment opportunities for recipients of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code at an acceptable wage level to attain self-sufficiency.

(b) Create opportunities for individuals working at a low wage to upgrade to a wage adequate to attain self-sufficiency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------

88643.

Each community college that participates in the Job Development Incentive Training Program shall inventory its local or regional business community, including nonprofit organizations, and identify industry-driven needs and employment opportunities with a goal of attaining self-sufficiency through workforce reentry, continuous employee training, and skills upgrades.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Reporting [88650. - 88650.5.]

88650.

(a) The chancellor shall implement performance accountability outcome measures for the economic and workforce development program that provide the Governor, Legislature, and general public with information that quantifies employer and student outcomes for those participating in the program. These performance accountability measures should, to the extent possible, align with the performance accountability measures of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(b) The chancellor shall submit a report to the Governor and Legislature on or about March 1 of each year.
 However, beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year, the chancellor shall submit this report biennially, on or before March 1, and may submit this report with the report required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 88826. A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) Sufficient information to ensure the understanding of the magnitude of expenditures, by type of expenditure, including those specified in Section 88625, disaggregated by industry sector or cluster, region, and type of grant.

(2) Data summarizing outcome accountability performance measures required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 28.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------

88650.5.

Prior to January 1, 2015, the chancellor shall contract for an independent evaluation of the effectiveness of the program in achieving the specific program goals and objectives set forth in this part. This performance evaluation shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, specific conclusions about the strengths and weaknesses of the program, as well as specific recommendations for strategies to improve the effectiveness of the program. The evaluation shall include an analysis of available outcome accountability performance measures and data for program participants. To the extent feasible, the analysis shall use experimental, quasi-experimental, or controlled case comparison methodology to compare outcome measures for
 program participants with a suitable control group to assess and isolate the
 impact of the program on program participants. The chancellor shall provide the findings of the study to the Legislature no later than March 1, 2016. This report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Repeal [88651. - 88651.]

88651.

This part shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   (AB 3087)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Part 52.5, commencing with Section 88600.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 52.7. California STEM Pathways Grant Program [88670. - 88671.]

88670.

(a) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges for a grant program that supports public-private partnerships that will prepare California students for high-skill jobs of the future in technology, manufacturing, and health care.

(b) The grant program shall deliver five core benefits to students:

(1) A rigorous, relevant, and cost-free education in grades 9 to 14, inclusive, focused on the knowledge and skills that students need for science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) careers.

(2) Workplace learning that includes mentoring by industry professionals, worksite visits, speakers, and internships.

(3) Intensive, individualized, academic support by both K–12 and postsecondary faculty within an extended academic year or school day that enables students to progress through the program at their own pace.

(4) An opportunity to earn an associate in science degree in a high-tech field or an associate degree for transfer in a STEM field.

(5) A commitment to students who complete the program to be first in line for a job with participating business partners following completion of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 45.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

88671.

(a) The chancellor shall award grants to be expended over a six-year period, to applicants that meet, at a minimum, all of the following conditions:

(1) Applicants are parties to an approved College and Career Access Pathways (CCAP) partnership pursuant to Section 76004 of the Education Code that will govern the delivery of the academic program to students and allocation of funding between the local educational agency and the community college district.

(2) Applicants shall demonstrate that the curriculum in grades 9 to 14, inclusive, shall lead to an associate in science degree in a high-tech field or an associate degree for transfer in a STEM field.

(3) Applicants have a signed memorandum of understanding between the CCAP partnership and one or more private businesses in technology, manufacturing, or health care that obligates the businesses to all of the following:

(A) Committing to place every student who successfully completes the program first in line for a job.

(B) Identifying a mentor for every participating student.

(C) Creating an up-to-date skills map for the industry or sector that identifies essential job requirements.

(D) Collaborating with the CCAP partnership to identify the postsecondary two-year degree that will ensure participating students meet industry expectations and to validate the proposed scope and sequence.

(E) Providing workplace visits, speakers, internships, and apprenticeships for participating students.

(F) Collaborating with the CCAP partnership staff to align technical skills and workplace competencies with curriculum, course offerings, and other resources.

(G) Providing dedicated staff to work on the initiative, including an industry liaison who has the authority to coordinate with the CCAP partnership on the business partners’ behalf.

(4) Students will attend classes from grades 9 to 14, inclusive, on a single campus.

(b) The chancellor shall prioritize applicants that will serve students who:

(1) Have been identified as academically or economically at risk for not
 successfully completing high school or not enrolling in, or succeeding in, college.

(2) Belong to populations that have historically not had access to, or success in, higher education, such as students with disabilities or English language learners.

(c) The chancellor shall award grants in a geographically diverse manner, to the extent possible, and shall not award more than one grant per county.

(d) The chancellor shall require applicants to submit enrollment, performance, and employment data.

(e) The chancellor shall develop and provide guidance to the program, including, but not limited to, appropriate uses of program funds and the manner in which the program will report data to meet the requirements of subdivision (h).

(f) The chancellor shall develop a request for proposal (RFP) process to determine grant awardees. The RFP process shall comply with the requirements of this section.

(g) For the purposes of this section, an applicant is comprised of a regional consortium that includes one or more of each of the following:

(1) A school district or charter school.

(2) A community college district.

(h) No later than January 10, 2025, the chancellor shall submit a report to the Director of Finance and the appropriate budget and policy committees of the Legislature. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the following:

(1) The
 degree to which grant recipients achieved the objectives in subdivision (a).

(2) The number and percentage of students enrolled in the program who earned a two-year associates degree within four, five, and six years.

(3) The number and percentage of students enrolled in the program who earned an industry-recognized certificate or credential within four, five, and six years.

(4) The number and percentage of students enrolled in the program who gained full-time employment in their area of study or training upon completion of the program.

(5) A range of the starting salaries of program graduates that gained full-time employment.

(6) The number and percentage of students enrolled in the
 program that enrolled in a four-year degree program upon completion of the program.

(7) It is the intent of the Legislature that the report disaggregate results by student subgroup as identified by Section 52052.

(i) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the 2017–18 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 93.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 52.8. Mathematics, Engineering, Science, Achievement (MESA) Program [88680. - 88682.]

88680.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as, the Mathematics, Engineering, Science, Achievement (MESA) Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 872, Sec. 1.   (SB 444)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

88681.

As used in this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Four-year higher education institution” means a four-year baccalaureate degree program offered at the University of California, the California State University, or an independent institution of higher education, as defined in Section 66010.

(b) “MESA programs” means Mathematics, Engineering, Science, Achievement programs established at community colleges to help underserved and underrepresented students majoring in calculus-based science, technology, engineering, and mathematics academic fields who seek to transfer to four-year higher education institutions.

(c) “STEM majors”
 means calculus-based science, technology, engineering, and mathematics academic fields.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 872, Sec. 1.   (SB 444)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

88682.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Community Colleges recognize the responsibility for supporting programs that enhance educational opportunities for STEM majors, and produce a diverse pool of baccalaureate degree graduates in STEM majors by preparing students for transfer to four-year higher education institutions.

(2) It is the intent of this part to encourage community college districts to establish and implement MESA programs at community colleges that are directed at identifying students affected by social, economic, and educational disadvantages, including disproportionately impacted students, increasing the number of eligible MESA program students served, and increasing student success in transferring and
 completing baccalaureate degree programs in STEM majors at four-year higher education institutions.

(3) The Legislature further intends that MESA programs are not viewed as the only means of providing services to socially, economically, and educationally disadvantaged students pursuing STEM majors who are eligible to transfer to four-year higher education institutions, or of meeting-related student and employee diversity objectives.

(4) The Legislature further intends that the categorical funding for MESA programs provided in the annual Budget Act for community colleges be used to establish, expand, and develop MESA programs and services for the purpose of enhancing California’s STEM workforce while aiding the state and nation in reducing equity and achievement gaps.

(b) The Board of Governors of the California
 Community Colleges shall adopt regulations for the operation of MESA programs at community colleges that align with the programmatic components of MESA programs. The operation of MESA programs and the regulations adopted by the board of governors shall accomplish all of the following goals:

(1) Increasing the number of socially, economically, and educationally disadvantaged students pursuing baccalaureate degrees in STEM majors who are eligible to transfer to four-year higher education institutions.

(2) Implementing efficient processes and practices and using existing college transfer centers to achieve greater MESA program student transfers to four-year higher education institutions.

(3) Implementing strategies to increase the rate at which MESA program students are deemed transfer-ready in STEM majors to four-year
 higher education institutions.

(4) Improving the academic performance of MESA program students.

(5) Increasing the leadership skills and raising the educational expectations of MESA program students.

(6) Strengthening relationships with educators and prospective employers in business and industry to establish student internships, scholarships, and other career opportunities for MESA program students.

(7) Establishing partnerships with University of California and California State University Mathematics, Engineering, Science, Achievement programs and Mathematics, Engineering, Science, Achievement College Preparatory programs, California Alliance for Minority Participation programs, or similar programs in an effort to provide optimal student support
 services.

(8) Implementing strategies to collaborate with campus programs, such as the Student Equity and Achievement Program established in Section 78222 and the Student Success and Support Program established in Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48, to leverage additional resources and opportunities for MESA program students and ensure that MESA programs are integrated into campus culture and infrastructure.

(c) MESA program support provided by a community college shall supplement, but not supplant, the regular educational programs offered by the college to encourage and support the enrollment of MESA program students who seek a baccalaureate degree in STEM majors at four-year higher education institutions.

(d) The governing board of a community college district shall not use any funds
 received from the state for the operation and administration of MESA programs to supplant existing college resources, programs, or services. The governing board may use MESA program funds to meet the matching requirements to receive federal funds, or funds granted by nonprofit foundations, designated for the same purposes as described in this part.

(e) Beginning in the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall reserve no more than 3.5 percent of the funds appropriated for MESA programs on administrative and discretionary costs of supporting MESA programs. The chancellor may allocate these reserved funds, in consultation with the Community College Association of MESA Directors, solely for statewide coordination and enhancement of MESA programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 745, Sec. 8.   (SB 148)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 53. Basic Skills Partnership Pilot Program [88700. - 88700.]

88700.

(a) It is the intent of the state that school districts, community college districts, the California State University, and the University of California coordinate their efforts to provide instruction in basic skills in an efficient and effective way.

(b) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall solicit applications from community college districts seeking funding for plans to provide instruction in basic skills to students enrolled, or who will enroll, at California State University campuses. As used in this section, “chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(c) A community college district
 that chooses to apply for a grant under this section shall include the following components of its plan in its application:

(1) A list of the community colleges and the California State University campuses that will work jointly to develop effective instruction in basic skills and provide instruction to focus on students enrolled, or who will enroll, at California State University campuses.

(2) A commitment from the California State University campuses listed in paragraph (1) that these campuses will direct students to instruction at community colleges.

(3) A narrative explaining the strategy for directing students to instruction at community colleges and integrating this instruction with programs at California State University campuses.

(4) A letter
 from each of the presidents of the California State University campuses listed in the application pursuant to paragraph (1) indicating support for the plan and identifying the fiscal impact for his or her particular campus.

(5) A narrative describing any effective evidence-based instructional strategies and practices the community colleges have implemented for the delivery of basic skills instruction and any efforts the community colleges have made to incorporate effective evidence-based instructional strategies and practices within the delivery of their basic skills instruction.

(6) A narrative describing how faculty was involved in the development of the plan.

(7) A narrative describing if and how the community college district intends to incorporate the use of student success data to inform the delivery of its
 basic skills instruction.

(8) A narrative describing the measures the community colleges listed pursuant to paragraph (1) will undertake to collaborate with local school districts serving kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to better articulate English and mathematics instruction between high schools located in the community college district and the community colleges and the California State University campuses listed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(d) (1) The chancellor, in consultation with the Chancellor of the California State University, shall award grants of two million dollars ($2,000,000) each to five of the applicant community college districts.

(2) The grants shall be awarded based on the projected success of the applicant districts in maximizing the following factors, which are
 listed below in order of decreasing priority:

(A) The number of students enrolled, or who will enroll, at California State University campuses and who would benefit from access to instruction in basic skills at the community colleges participating in the plan.

(B) The number of California State University campuses participating in the plan.

(C) The number of community college campuses participating in the plan.

(D) The likelihood that the plan would be implemented effectively.

(E) The use of effective evidence-based instructional strategies and practices the community colleges have implemented for the delivery of basic skills instruction. Community college districts are encouraged to align
 the delivery of basic skills instruction with California State University campus programs that will accelerate the progress of underprepared students toward college completion.

(e) (1) Upon awarding the grants, the chancellor shall allocate one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the grant funds to each community college district selected for a grant.

(2) The chancellor shall release the remainder of a grant amount only after the community college district has submitted records demonstrating that students enrolled, or planning to enroll, at California State University campuses have accessed instruction in basic skills at the community colleges pursuant to the plan. Notwithstanding this reporting condition, the chancellor shall release any amount of a grant that remains as of May 1, 2018, to the community college district by June 30, 2018.

(f) As a condition of receiving a grant pursuant to this section, a community college district shall provide all of the following information to the chancellor by February 1, 2017:

(1) The number of students enrolled, or who will enroll, at California State University campuses who were provided, or are being provided, instruction by community colleges pursuant to the adopted plan.

(2) The number of students who successfully completed basic skills instruction at the community colleges, defined as demonstrating competency on California State University assessments or successful completion of appropriate college-level courses.

(3) The number of students provided instruction at the community colleges who subsequently enrolled at a California State University
 campus and demonstrated competency on California State University assessments or successful completion of appropriate college-level courses.

(4) To the extent available, first-year retention and success rates at the California State University of students who received basic skills instruction at the community colleges pursuant to the plan.

(5) A qualitative description of the local successes or challenges that community colleges encountered when partnering with California State University campuses to provide instruction in basic skills to students enrolled, or who will enroll, at those campuses.

(6) A narrative describing the use of effective evidence-based practices by the community colleges to deliver basic skills instruction to accelerate the progress of underprepared students toward achieving postsecondary
 educational and career goals. This narrative shall also include a description of the efforts of the community colleges to implement or expand the use of effective evidence-based practices to deliver basic skills instruction.

(7) A narrative describing the measures implemented by the community college district to collaborate with local school districts serving kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to better articulate English and mathematics instruction between high schools located in the community college district and the community colleges and the California State University campuses listed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(g) No later than April 1, 2017, and following consultation with the Chancellor of the California State University, the chancellor shall analyze the information provided under subdivision (f), and report to the Legislature, the Legislative
 Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the effectiveness of the plans in delivering instruction in basic skills to students enrolled, or who will enroll, at California State University campuses. This report shall also include a report on costs avoided by the California State University, if any, and recommendations on expanded use of community colleges to deliver basic skills instruction to California State University students. A report to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) The attendance of students enrolled in a basic skills course pursuant to this section may be reported by a community college district for apportionment purposes.

(i) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the chancellor for allocation to community college
 districts to establish a basic skills partnership program at five community college districts in accordance with this section.

(j) For the purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (i) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2014–15 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2014–15 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 22, Sec. 19.   (SB 81)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 53.5. Pathways to Law School Programs [88750. - 88750.]

88750.

(a) Upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate funding to community colleges for the purpose of expanding pathways to law school programs, which may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Supporting opportunities for dual enrollment partnerships between community colleges and local high school law academies.
